California statutes. Vehicle Code
(g) If the person in charge of a vehicle upon a highway or public land is, by reason of physical injuries or illness, incapacitated to an extent so as to be unable to provide for its custody or removal.

(h) (1) If an officer arrests a person driving or in control of a vehicle for an alleged offense, and the officer is, by this code or other law,
 required or permitted to take, and, except as provided in Section 23109.3, does take, the person into custody.

(2) If an officer serves a notice of an order of suspension or revocation pursuant to Section 13388 or 13389.

(i) (1) If a vehicle, other than a rented vehicle, is found upon a highway or public land, or is removed pursuant to this code, and it is known that the vehicle has been issued five or more notices of parking violations to which the owner or person in control of the vehicle has not responded within 21 calendar days of notice of citation issuance or citation issuance or 14 calendar days of the mailing of a notice of delinquent parking violation to the agency responsible for processing notices of parking violations, or the registered owner of the
 vehicle is known to have been issued five or more notices for failure to pay or failure to appear in court for traffic violations for which a certificate has not been issued by the magistrate or clerk of the court hearing the case showing that the case has been adjudicated or concerning which the registered owner’s record has not been cleared pursuant to Chapter 6
 (commencing with Section 41500) of Division 17, the vehicle may be impounded until that person furnishes to the impounding law enforcement agency all of the following:

(A) Evidence of their identity.

(B) An address within this state where they can be located.

(C) Satisfactory evidence that all parking penalties due for the vehicle and all other vehicles registered to the registered owner of the impounded vehicle and all traffic violations of the registered owner have been cleared.

(2) The requirements in subparagraph (C) of paragraph (1) shall be fully enforced by the impounding law enforcement agency on and after the time that the Department
 of Motor Vehicles is able to provide access to the necessary records.

(3) A notice of parking violation issued for an unlawfully parked vehicle shall be accompanied by a warning that repeated violations may result in the impounding of the vehicle. In lieu of furnishing satisfactory evidence that the full amount of parking penalties or bail has been deposited, that person may demand to be taken without unnecessary delay before a magistrate, for traffic offenses, or a hearing examiner, for parking offenses, within the county where the offenses charged are alleged to have been committed and who has jurisdiction of the offenses and is nearest or most accessible with reference to the place where the vehicle is impounded. Evidence of current registration shall be produced after a vehicle has been impounded, or, at the discretion of the impounding
 law enforcement agency, a notice to appear for violation of subdivision (a) of Section 4000 shall be issued to that person.

(4) A vehicle shall be released to the legal owner, as defined in Section 370, if the legal owner does all of the following:

(A) Pays the cost of towing and storing the vehicle.

(B) Submits evidence of payment of fees as provided in Section 9561.

(C) Completes an affidavit in a form acceptable to the impounding law enforcement agency stating that the vehicle was not in possession of the legal owner at the time of occurrence of the offenses relating to standing or parking. A vehicle released to a legal owner under this subdivision is a
 repossessed vehicle for purposes of disposition or sale. The impounding agency shall have a lien on any surplus that remains upon sale of the vehicle, to which the registered owner is or may be entitled, as security for the full
 amount of the parking penalties for all notices of parking violations issued for the vehicle and for all local administrative charges imposed pursuant to Section 22850.5. The legal owner shall promptly remit to, and deposit with, the agency responsible for processing notices of parking violations from that surplus, on receipt of that surplus, the full amount of the parking penalties for all notices of parking violations issued for the vehicle and for all local administrative charges imposed pursuant to Section 22850.5.

(5) The impounding agency that has a lien on the surplus that remains upon the sale of a vehicle to which a registered owner is entitled pursuant to paragraph (4) has a deficiency claim against the registered owner for the full amount of the parking penalties for all notices of parking violations issued for the
 vehicle and for all local administrative charges imposed pursuant to Section 22850.5, less the amount received from the sale of the vehicle.

(j) If a vehicle is found illegally parked and there are no license plates or other evidence of registration displayed, the vehicle may be impounded until the owner or person in control of the vehicle furnishes the impounding law enforcement agency evidence of their identity and an address within this state where they can be located.

(k) If a vehicle is parked or left standing upon a highway for 72 or more consecutive hours in violation of a local ordinance authorizing removal.

(l) If a vehicle is illegally parked on a highway in violation of a local ordinance forbidding
 standing or parking and the use of a highway, or a portion thereof, is necessary for the cleaning, repair, or construction of the highway, or for the installation of underground utilities, and signs giving notice that the vehicle may be removed are erected or placed at least 24 hours prior to the removal by a local authority pursuant to the ordinance.

(m) If the use of the highway, or a portion of the highway, is authorized by a local authority for a purpose other than the normal flow of traffic or for the movement of equipment, articles, or structures of unusual size, and the parking of a vehicle would prohibit or interfere with that use or movement, and signs giving notice that the vehicle may be removed are erected or placed at least 24 hours prior to the removal by a local authority pursuant to the ordinance.

(n) Whenever a vehicle is parked or left standing where local authorities, by resolution or ordinance, have prohibited parking and have authorized the removal of vehicles. Except as provided in subdivisions (v) and (w), a vehicle shall not be removed unless signs are posted giving notice of the removal.

(o) (1) If a vehicle is found or operated upon a highway, public land, or an offstreet parking facility under any of the following circumstances:

(A) (i) With a registration expiration date in excess of six months before the date it is found or operated on the highway, public lands, or the offstreet parking facility.

(ii) Prior to removing a vehicle pursuant to this subparagraph, the officer or employee shall verify, using available Department of Motor Vehicles records, that no current registration exists for the vehicle. A vehicle shall not be removed pursuant to this subparagraph if it has a current registration on file with the Department of Motor Vehicles, regardless of whether the vehicle is in compliance with subdivision (a) of Section 5204. If the officer or employee does not have immediate access to those records, a vehicle shall not be removed pursuant to this subparagraph.

(B) Displaying in, or upon, the vehicle, a registration card, identification card, temporary receipt, license plate, special plate, registration sticker, device issued pursuant to Section 4853, or permit that was not issued for that vehicle or is not otherwise lawfully
 used on that vehicle under this code.

(C) Displaying in, or upon, the vehicle, an altered, forged, counterfeit, or falsified registration card, identification card, temporary receipt, license plate, special plate, registration sticker, device issued pursuant to Section 4853, or permit.

(D) (i) The vehicle is operating using autonomous technology, without the registered owner or manufacturer of the vehicle having first applied for and obtained a valid permit that is required to operate the vehicle on public roads pursuant to Section 38750, Article 3.7 (commencing with Section 227.00) of Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations, and Article 3.8 (commencing with Section 228.00) of Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations.

(ii) The vehicle is operating using autonomous technology after the registered owner or person in control of the vehicle received notice that the vehicle’s permit required for the operation of the vehicle pursuant to Section 38750, Article 3.7 (commencing with Section 227.00) of Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations, and Article 3.8 (commencing with Section 228.00) of Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations is suspended, terminated, or revoked.

(iii) For purposes of this subdivision, the terms “autonomous technology” and “autonomous vehicle” have the same meanings as in Section 38750.

(iv) This subparagraph does not provide the authority for a peace officer to stop an autonomous vehicle solely for the
 purpose of determining whether the vehicle is operating using autonomous technology without a valid permit required to operate the autonomous vehicle on public roads pursuant to Section 38750, Article 3.7 (commencing with Section 227.00) of Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations, and Article 3.8 (commencing with Section 228.00) of Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations.

(2) If a vehicle described in paragraph (1) is occupied, only a peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, may remove the vehicle.

(3) For the purposes of this subdivision, the vehicle shall be released under any of the following circumstances:

(A) If the vehicle has been
 removed pursuant to subparagraph (A), (B), or (C) of paragraph (1), to the registered owner of, or person in control of, the vehicle only after the owner or person furnishes the storing law enforcement agency with proof of current registration and a valid driver’s license to operate the vehicle.

(B) If the vehicle has been removed pursuant to subparagraph (D) of paragraph (1), to the registered owner of, or person in control of, the autonomous vehicle, after the registered owner or person furnishes the storing law enforcement agency with proof of current registration and a valid driver’s license, if required to operate the autonomous vehicle, and either of the following:

(i) Proof of a valid permit required to operate the autonomous vehicle using autonomous technology on public roads
 pursuant to Section 38750, Article 3.7 (commencing with Section 227.00) of Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations, and Article 3.8 (commencing with Section 228.00) of Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations.

(ii) A declaration or sworn statement to the Department of Motor Vehicles that states that the autonomous vehicle will not be operated using autonomous technology upon public roads without first obtaining a valid permit to operate the vehicle pursuant to Section 38750, Article 3.7 (commencing with Section 227.00) of Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations, and Article 3.8 (commencing with Section 228.00) of Title 13 of the California Code of Regulations.

(C) To the legal owner or the legal owner’s agency, without payment of any fees, fines, or
 penalties for parking tickets or registration and without proof of current registration, if the vehicle will only be transported pursuant to the exemption specified in Section 4022 and if the legal owner does all of the following:

(i) Pays the cost of towing and storing the vehicle.

(ii) Completes an affidavit in a form acceptable to the impounding law enforcement agency stating that the vehicle was not in possession of the legal owner at the time of occurrence of an offense relating to standing or parking. A vehicle released to a legal owner under this subdivision is a repossessed vehicle for purposes of disposition or sale. The impounding agency has a lien on any surplus that remains upon sale of the vehicle to which the registered owner is or may be entitled, as security for the full amount
 of parking penalties for any notices of parking violations issued for the vehicle and for all local administrative charges imposed pursuant to Section 22850.5. Upon receipt of any surplus, the legal owner shall promptly remit to, and deposit with, the agency responsible for processing notices of parking violations from that surplus, the full amount of the parking penalties for all notices of parking violations issued for the vehicle and for all local administrative charges imposed pursuant to Section 22850.5.

(4) The impounding agency that has a lien on the surplus that remains upon the sale of a vehicle to which a registered owner is entitled has a deficiency claim against the registered owner for the full amount of parking penalties for any notices of parking violations issued for the vehicle and for all local administrative charges imposed
 pursuant to Section 22850.5, less the amount received from the sale of the vehicle.

(5) As used in this subdivision, “offstreet parking facility” means an offstreet facility held open for use by the public for parking vehicles and includes a publicly owned facility for offstreet parking and a privately owned facility for offstreet parking if a fee is not charged for the privilege to park and it is held open for the common public use of retail customers.

(p) If the peace officer issues the driver of a vehicle a notice to appear for a violation of Section 12500, 14601, 14601.1, 14601.2, 14601.3, 14601.4, 14601.5, or 14604, and the vehicle is not impounded pursuant to Section 22655.5. A vehicle so removed from the highway or public land, or from private property after having been
 on a highway or public land, shall not be released to the registered owner or their agent, except upon presentation of the registered owner’s or their agent’s currently valid driver’s license to operate the vehicle and proof of current vehicle registration to the impounding law enforcement agency or upon order of a court.

(q) If a vehicle is parked for more than 24 hours on a portion of highway that is located within the boundaries of a common interest development, as defined in Section 4100 or 6534 of the Civil Code, and signs, as required by paragraph (1) of subdivision (a) of Section 22658 of this code, have been posted on that portion of highway providing notice to drivers that vehicles parked thereon for more than 24 hours will be removed at the owner’s expense pursuant to a resolution or ordinance adopted by the local authority.

(r) If a vehicle is illegally parked and blocks the movement of a legally parked vehicle.

(s) (1) If a vehicle, except highway maintenance or construction equipment, an authorized emergency vehicle, or a vehicle that is properly permitted or otherwise authorized by the Department of
 Transportation, is stopped, parked, or left standing for more than eight hours within a roadside rest area or viewpoint.

(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), if a commercial motor vehicle, as defined in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 15210, is stopped, parked, or left standing for more than 10 hours within a roadside rest area or viewpoint.

(3) For purposes of this subdivision, a roadside rest area or viewpoint is a publicly maintained vehicle parking area, adjacent to a highway, utilized for the convenient, safe stopping of a vehicle to enable motorists to rest or to view the scenery. If two or more roadside rest areas are located on opposite sides of the highway, or upon the center divider, within seven miles of each other, then that combination of rest
 areas is considered to be the same rest area.

(t) If a peace officer issues a notice to appear for a violation of Section 25279.

(u) If a peace officer issues a citation for a violation of Section 11700, and the vehicle is being offered for sale.

(v) (1) If a vehicle is a mobile billboard advertising display, as defined in Section 395.5, and is parked or left standing in violation of a local resolution or ordinance adopted pursuant to subdivision (m) of Section 21100, if the registered owner of the vehicle was previously issued a warning citation for the same offense pursuant to paragraph (2).

(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of
 Section 22507, a city or county, in lieu of posting signs noticing a local ordinance prohibiting mobile billboard advertising displays adopted pursuant to subdivision (m) of Section 21100 may provide notice by issuing a warning citation advising the registered owner of the vehicle that they may be subject to penalties upon a subsequent violation of the ordinance that may include the removal of the vehicle as provided in paragraph (1). A city or county is not required to provide further notice for a subsequent violation prior to the enforcement of penalties for a violation of the ordinance.

(w) (1) If a vehicle is parked or left standing in violation of a local ordinance or resolution adopted pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 21100, if the registered owner of the vehicle was previously issued a warning citation for
 the same offense pursuant to paragraph (2).

(2) Notwithstanding subdivision (a) of Section 22507, a city or county, in lieu of posting signs noticing a local ordinance regulating advertising signs adopted pursuant to subdivision (p) of Section 21100 may provide notice by issuing a warning citation advising the registered owner of the vehicle that they may be subject to penalties upon a subsequent violation of the ordinance that may include the removal of the vehicle as provided in paragraph (1). A city or county is not required to provide further notice for a subsequent violation before the enforcement of penalties for a violation of the ordinance.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 501, Sec. 1.   (AB 1978)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

22651.05.

(a) A trained volunteer of a state or local law enforcement agency, who is engaged in directing traffic or enforcing parking laws and regulations, of a city, county, or jurisdiction of a state agency in which a vehicle is located, may remove or authorize the removal of a vehicle located within the territorial limits in which an officer or employee of that agency may act, under any of the following circumstances:

(1) When a vehicle is parked or left standing upon a highway for 72 or more consecutive hours in violation of a local ordinance authorizing the removal.

(2) When a vehicle is illegally parked or left standing on a highway in violation of a local
 ordinance forbidding standing or parking and the use of a highway, or a portion thereof, is necessary for the cleaning, repair, or construction of the highway, or for the installation of underground utilities, and signs giving notice that the vehicle may be removed are erected or placed at least 24 hours prior to the removal by local authorities pursuant to the ordinance.

(3) Wherever the use of the highway, or a portion thereof, is authorized by local authorities for a purpose other than the normal flow of traffic or for the movement of equipment, articles, or structures of unusual size, and the parking of a vehicle would prohibit or interfere with that use or movement, and signs giving notice that the vehicle may be removed are erected or placed at least 24 hours prior to the removal by local authorities pursuant to the ordinance.

(4) Whenever a vehicle is parked or left
 standing where local authorities, by resolution or ordinance, have prohibited parking and have authorized the removal of vehicles. A vehicle may not be removed unless signs are posted giving notice of the removal.

(5) Whenever a vehicle is parked for more than 24 hours on a portion of highway that is located within the boundaries of a common interest development, as defined in Section 4100 or 6534 of the Civil Code, and signs, as required by Section 22658.2, have been posted on that portion of highway providing notice to drivers that vehicles parked thereon for more than 24 hours will be removed at the owner’s expense, pursuant to a resolution or ordinance adopted by the local authority.

(b) The provisions of this chapter that apply to a vehicle removed pursuant to Section 22651 apply to a vehicle removed pursuant to subdivision (a).

(c) For purposes of subdivision (a), a “trained volunteer” is a person who, of his or her own free will, provides services, without any financial gain, to a local or state law enforcement agency, and who is duly trained and certified to remove a vehicle by a local or state law enforcement agency.

(History: Amended (as amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 181, Sec. 82) by Stats. 2013, Ch. 605, Sec. 51.   (SB 752)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

22651.07.

(a) A person, including a law enforcement agency, city, county, city and county, the state, a tow yard, storage facility, or an impounding yard, that charges for towing or storage, or both, shall do all of the following:

(1) (A) Except as provided in subparagraph (B), post in the office area of the storage facility, in plain view of the public, the Towing and Storage Fees and Access Notice and have copies readily available to the public.

(B) An automotive repair dealer, registered pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 9884) of Chapter 20.3 of Division
 3 of the Business and Professions Code, that does not provide towing services is exempt from the requirements to post the Towing and Storage Fees and Access Notice in the office area.

(2) Provide, upon request, a copy of the Towing and Storage Fees and Access Notice to any owner or operator of a towed or stored vehicle.

(3) Provide a distinct notice on an itemized invoice for any towing or storage, or both, charges stating: “Upon request, you are entitled to receive a copy of the Towing and Storage Fees and Access Notice.” This notice shall be contained within a bordered text box, printed in no less than 10-point type.

(b) Prior to receiving payment for any towing, recovery, or storage-related fees, a facility that
 charges for towing or storage, or both, shall provide an itemized invoice of actual charges to the vehicle owner or his or her agent. If an automotive repair dealer, registered pursuant to Article 3 (commencing with Section 9884) of Chapter 20.3 of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code, did not provide the tow, and passes along, from the tower to the consumer, any of the information required on the itemized invoice, pursuant to subdivision (g) the automotive repair dealer shall not be responsible for the accuracy of those items of information that remain unaltered.

(c) Prior to paying any towing, recovery, or storage-related fees, a vehicle owner or his or her agent or a licensed repossessor shall, at any facility where the vehicle is being stored, have the right to all of the following:

(1) Receive his or her personal property, at no charge, during normal business hours. Normal business hours for releasing collateral and personal property are Monday through Friday from 8:00 a.m. to 5:00 p.m., inclusive, except state holidays.

(2) Retrieve his or her vehicle during the first 72 hours of storage and not pay a lien fee.

(3) (A) Inspect the vehicle without paying a fee. 

(B) Have his or her insurer inspect the vehicle at the storage facility, at no charge, during normal business hours. However, the storage facility may limit the inspection to increments of 45 consecutive minutes in order to provide service to any other waiting customer, after which the insurer may resume the
 inspection for additional increments of 45 consecutive minutes, as necessary.

(4) Request a copy of the Towing and Storage Fees and Access Notice.

(5) Be permitted to pay by cash, insurer’s check, or a valid bank credit card. Credit charges for towing and storage services shall comply with Section 1748.1 of the Civil Code. Law enforcement agencies may include the costs of providing for payment by credit when agreeing with a towing or storage provider on rates.

(d) A storage facility shall be open and accessible during normal business hours, as defined in subdivision (c). Outside of normal business hours, the facility shall provide a telephone number that permits the caller to leave a message. Calls to this number shall be
 returned no later than six business hours after a message has been left.

(e) The Towing and Storage Fees and Access Notice shall be a standardized document plainly printed in no less that 10-point type. A person may distribute the form using its own letterhead, but the language of the Towing and Storage Fees and Access Notice shall read as follows:Towing and Storage Fees and Access NoticeNote: The following information is intended to serve as a general summary of some of the laws that provide vehicle owners certain rights when their vehicle is towed. It is not intended to summarize all of the laws that may be applicable nor is it
 intended to fully and completely state the entire law in any area listed. Please review the applicable California code for a definitive statement of the law in your particular situation.How much can a towing company charge?Rates for public tows and storage are generally established by an agreement between the law enforcement agency requesting the tow and the towing company (to confirm the approved rates, you may contact the law enforcement agency that initiated the tow; additionally, these rates are required to be posted at the storage facility).Rates for private property tows and storage cannot exceed the approved rates for the law enforcement agency that has primary
 jurisdiction for the property from which the vehicle was removed or the towing company’s approved CHP rate.Rates for owner’s request tows and storage are generally established by mutual agreement between the requestor and the towing company, but may be dictated by agreements established between the requestor’s motor club and motor club service provider.Where can you complain about a towing company?For public tows: Contact the law enforcement agency initiating the tow.Your rights if your vehicle is towed:Generally, prior to
 paying any towing and storage-related fees you have the right to:● Receive an itemized invoice of actual charges.● Receive your personal property, at no charge, during normal business hours.● Retrieve your vehicle during the first 72 hours of storage and not pay a lien fee.● Request a copy of the Towing and Storage Fees and Access Notice.● Pay by cash, valid bank credit card, or a check issued by your insurer.● Inspect your vehicle. ● Have your insurer inspect your vehicle at the storage facility, at no charge, during normal business hours. However, the storage facility may limit the inspection to increments of 45 consecutive minutes in order to provide service to any other waiting customer, after which the insurer may resume the inspection for additional increments of 45 consecutive minutes, as necessary.You and your insurance company or the insurance company representative have the right to have the vehicle released immediately upon (1) payment of all towing and storage-related fees, (2) presentation of a valid photo identification, (3) presentation of reliable documentation showing that you are the owner, insured, or insurer of the vehicle or that the owner has authorized you to take possession of the vehicle, and (4), if applicable, in the case of a fatality or crime,
 presentation of any required police or law enforcement release documents.Prior to your vehicle being repaired:● You have the right to choose the repair facility and to have no repairs made to your vehicle unless you authorize them in writing.● Any authorization you sign for towing and any authorization you sign for repair must be on separate forms.What if I do not pay the towing and storage-related fees or abandon my vehicle at the towing company?Pursuant to Sections 3068.1 to 3074, inclusive, of the Civil Code, a towing company may sell your
 vehicle and any moneys received will be applied to towing and storage-related fees that have accumulated against your vehicle.You are responsible for paying the towing company any outstanding balance due on any of these fees once the sale is complete.Who is liable if my vehicle was damaged during towing or storage?Generally the owner of a vehicle may recover for any damage to the vehicle resulting from any intentional or negligent act of a person causing the removal of, or removing, the vehicle.What happens if a towing company violates the law?If a tow company does not satisfactorily meet certain requirements detailed in this notice, you may bring a lawsuit in court, generally in small claims court. The tower may be civilly liable for damages up to two times the amount charged, not to exceed $500, and possibly more for certain violations.(f) “Insurer,” as used in this section, means either a first-party insurer or third-party insurer.

(g) “Itemized invoice,” as used in this section, means a written document that contains the following information. Any document that substantially complies with this subdivision shall be deemed an “itemized invoice” for purposes of this section:

(1) The name,
 address, telephone number, and carrier identification number as required by subdivision (a) of Section 34507.5 of the person that is charging for towing and storage.

(2) If ascertainable, the registered owner or operator’s name, address, and telephone number.

(3) The date service was initiated.

(4) The location of the vehicle at the time service was initiated, including either the address or nearest intersecting roadways.

(5) A vehicle description that includes, if ascertainable, the vehicle year, make, model, odometer reading, license plate number, or if a license plate number is unavailable, the vehicle identification number (VIN).

(6) The service dispatch time, the service arrival time of the tow truck, and the service completion time.

(7) A clear, itemized, and detailed explanation of any additional services that caused the total towing-related service time to exceed one hour between service dispatch time and service completion time.

(8) The hourly rate or per item rate used to calculate the total towing and recovery-related fees. These fees shall be listed as separate line items.

(9) If subject to storage fees, the daily storage rate and the total number of days stored. The storage fees shall be listed as a separate line item. Storage rates shall comply with the requirements of subdivision
 (c) of Section 22524.5.

(10) If subject to a gate fee, the date and time the vehicle was
 released after normal business hours. Normal business hours are Monday through Friday from 8:00 a.m. to 5:00 p.m., inclusive, except state holidays. A gate fee shall be listed as a separate line item. A gate fee shall comply with the requirements in subdivision (c) of Section 22524.5.

(11) A description of the method of towing.

(12) If the tow was not requested by the vehicle’s owner or driver, the identity of the person or governmental agency that directed the tow. This paragraph shall not apply to information otherwise required to be redacted under Section 22658.

(13) A clear, itemized, and detailed explanation of any additional services or fees.

(h) “Person,”
 as used in this section, includes those entities described in subdivision (a) and has the same meaning as described in Section 470.

(i) An insurer, insurer’s agent, or tow hauler, shall be permitted to pay for towing and storage charges by a valid bank credit card, insurer’s check, or bank draft.

(j) Except as otherwise exempted in this section, the requirements of this section apply to any facility that charges for the storage of a vehicle, including, but not limited to, a vehicle repair garage or service station, but not including a new motor vehicle dealer.

(k) A person who violates this section is civilly liable to a registered or legal owner of the vehicle, or a registered owner’s insurer, for up to two times
 the amount charged. Liability in any action brought under this section shall not exceed five hundred dollars ($500) per vehicle.

(l) A suspected violation of this section may be reported by any person, including, without limitation, the legal or registered owner of a vehicle or his or her insurer.

(m) This section shall not apply to the towing or storage of a repossessed vehicle by any person subject to, or exempt from, the Collateral Recovery Act (Chapter 11 (commencing with Section 7500) of Division 3 of the Business and Professions Code).

(n) This section does not relieve a person from the obligation to comply with any other law.

(o) Notwithstanding this
 section, an insurer shall comply with all of its obligations under Section 2695.8 of Chapter 5 of Title 10 of the California Code of Regulations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 434, Sec. 3.   (AB 2392)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

22651.08.

(a) A peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, may remove a vehicle located within the territorial limits in which the officer may act, under either of the following circumstances:

(1) A person is operating a vehicle with fewer than four wheels that does not meet the definition of an electric bicycle set forth in Section 312.5 and is both of the following:

(A) Powered by an electric motor capable of exclusively propelling the vehicle in excess of 20 miles per hour on a highway.

(B) Being operated by an operator who is not licensed to operate the vehicle.

(2) A person is operating a vehicle that is a class 3 electric bicycle in violation of subdivision (a) of Section 21213.

(b) (1) A city, county, or city and county may adopt at a public meeting a regulation, ordinance, or resolution imposing charges equal to its administrative costs relating to the removal, seizure, and storage costs. The charges shall not exceed the actual costs incurred for the expenses directly related to removing, seizing, and storing the vehicle.

(2) A local jurisdiction that has adopted a regulation, ordinance, or resolution pursuant to paragraph (1) shall publicly and conspicuously post the schedule of charges on their internet website.

(c) An agency shall release a seized vehicle to the owner, violator, or their agent after a minimum of 48 hours, if both of the following conditions are met:

(1) The owner, violator, or authorized agent’s request is made during normal business hours.

(2) The applicable removal, seizure, and storage costs have been paid.

(d) If a peace officer removes a vehicle pursuant to paragraph (2) of subdivision
 (a), an agency may, as a condition of release, require the owner, violator, or the parent or legal guardian of the owner or violator to deliver proof that the violator has completed an electric bicycle safety and training program, as described in Section 894 of the Streets and Highways Code, or a related local bicycle safety course, if one is available, as prescribed by authorities in the local jurisdiction.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 168, Sec. 1.   (AB 875)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

22651.1.

Persons operating or in charge of any storage facility where vehicles are stored pursuant to Section 22651 shall accept a valid bank credit card or cash for payment of towing and storage by the registered owner, legal owner, or the owner’s agent claiming the vehicle. A credit card shall be in the name of the person presenting the card. “Credit card” means “credit card” as defined in subdivision (a) of Section 1747.02 of the
 Civil Code, except, for the purposes of this section, credit card does not include a credit card issued by a retail seller. A person operating or in charge of any storage facility who refuses to accept a valid bank credit card shall be liable to the owner of the vehicle or to the person who tendered the fees for four times the amount of the towing and storage charges, but not to exceed five hundred dollars ($500). In addition, persons operating or in charge of the storage facility shall have sufficient funds on the premises to accommodate and make change in a reasonable monetary transaction.

Credit charges for towing and storage services shall comply with Section 1748.1 of the Civil Code. Law enforcement agencies may include the costs of providing for payment by credit when agreeing with a towing or storage provider on rates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 322, Sec. 9.   (AB 515)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

22651.2.

(a) Any peace officer, as defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, or any regularly employed and salaried employee, who is engaged in directing traffic or enforcing parking laws and regulations of a city, county, or jurisdiction of a state agency in which a vehicle is located, may remove a vehicle located within the territorial limits in which the officer or employee may act when the vehicle is found upon a highway or any public lands, and if all of the following requirements are
 satisfied:

(1) Because of the size and placement of signs or placards on the vehicle, it appears that the primary purpose of parking the vehicle at that location is to advertise to the public an event or function on private property or on public property hired for a private event or function to which the public is invited.

(2) The vehicle is known to have been previously issued a notice of parking violation that was accompanied by a notice warning that an additional parking violation may result in the impoundment of the vehicle.

(3) The registered owner of the vehicle has been mailed a notice advising of the existence of the parking violation and that an additional violation may result in the impoundment of the vehicle.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not
 apply to a vehicle bearing any sign or placard advertising any business or enterprise carried on by or through the use of that vehicle.

(c) Section 22852 applies to the removal of any vehicle pursuant to this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 17, Sec. 144.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

22651.3.

(a) Any peace officer, as that term is defined in Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, or any regularly employed and salaried employee, who is engaged in directing traffic or enforcing parking laws and regulations, of a city, county, or jurisdiction of a state agency in which any vehicle, other than a rented vehicle, is located may remove the vehicle from an offstreet public parking facility located within the territorial limits in which the officer or employee may act when the vehicle is known
 to have been issued five or more notices of parking violation over a period of five or more days, to which the owner or person in control of the vehicle has not responded or when any vehicle is illegally parked so as to prevent the movement of a legally parked vehicle.

A notice of parking violation issued to a vehicle which is registered in a foreign jurisdiction or is without current California registration and is known to have been issued five or more notices of parking violation over a period of five or more days shall be accompanied by a warning that repeated violations may result in the impounding of the vehicle.
